output.aff
SFX Y Y 137
SFX Y   e           ejsie      e
SFX Y   e           ejsia      e
SFX Y   e           ejsi       e
SFX Y   e           ejsieho    e
SFX Y   e           ejsej      e
SFX Y   e           ejsich     e
SFX Y   e           ejsiemu    e
SFX Y   e           ejsej      e
SFX Y   e           ejsim      e
SFX Y   e           ejsiu      e
SFX Y   e           ejsich     e
SFX Y   e           ejsom      e
SFX Y   e           ejsim      e
SFX Y   e           ejsou      e
SFX Y   e           ejsimi     e
SFX Y   i           e          i
SFX Y   i           a          i
SFX Y   i           eho        i
SFX Y   i           ej         i
SFX Y   i           ich        i
SFX Y   i           emu        i
SFX Y   i           im         i
SFX Y   i           u          i
SFX Y   i           om         i
SFX Y   i           ou         i
SFX Y   i           imi        i
SFX Y   0           y          m
SFX Y   0           i          m
SFX Y   0           e          m
SFX Y   0           a          m
SFX Y   0           eho        m
SFX Y   0           ej         m
SFX Y   0           ych        m
SFX Y   0           emu        m
SFX Y   0           ej         m
SFX Y   0           ym         m
SFX Y   0           u          m
SFX Y   0           om         m
SFX Y   0           ou         m
SFX Y   0           ymi        m
SFX Y   0           a          in
SFX Y   0           o          in
SFX Y   0           i          in
SFX Y   0           e          in
SFX Y   0           ho         in
SFX Y   0           ej         in
SFX Y   0           ych        in
SFX Y   0           mu         in
SFX Y   0           ym         in
SFX Y   0           u          in
SFX Y   0           om         in
SFX Y   0           ou         in
SFX Y   0           ymi        in
SFX Y   0           a          ov
SFX Y   0           o          ov
SFX Y   0           i          ov
SFX Y   0           e          ov
SFX Y   0           ho         ov
SFX Y   0           ej         ov
SFX Y   0           ych        ov
SFX Y   0           mu         ov
SFX Y   0           ym         ov
SFX Y   0           u          ov
SFX Y   0           om         ov
SFX Y   0           ou         ov
SFX Y   0           ymi        ov
SFX Y   y           e          y
SFX Y   y           a          y
SFX Y   y           i          y
SFX Y   y           o          y
SFX Y   y           eho        y
SFX Y   y           ej         y
SFX Y   y           ych        y
SFX Y   y           emu        y
SFX Y   y           ym         y
SFX Y   y           u          y
SFX Y   y           om         y
SFX Y   y           ou         y
SFX Y   y           ymi        y
SFX Y   y           ejsie      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsia      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsi       [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsieho    [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsej      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsich     [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsiemu    [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsej      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsim      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsiu      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsich     [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsom      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsim      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsou      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsimi     [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           i          y
SFX Y   y           e          y
SFX Y   y           a          y
SFX Y   y           eho        y
SFX Y   y           ej         y
SFX Y   y           ych        y
SFX Y   y           emu        y
SFX Y   y           ej         y
SFX Y   y           ym         y
SFX Y   y           u          y
SFX Y   y           om         y
SFX Y   y           ou         y
SFX Y   y           ymi        y
SFX Y   y           ejsie      [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsia      [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsi       [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsieho    [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsej      [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsich     [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsiemu    [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsej      [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsim      [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsiu      [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsich     [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsom      [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsim      [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsou      [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejsimi     [kntv]y
SFX Y   y           sie        [dh]y
SFX Y   y           sia        [dh]y
SFX Y   y           si         [dh]y
SFX Y   y           sieho      [dh]y
SFX Y   y           sej        [dh]y
SFX Y   y           sich       [dh]y
SFX Y   y           siemu      [dh]y
SFX Y   y           sej        [dh]y
SFX Y   y           sim        [dh]y
SFX Y   y           siu        [dh]y
SFX Y   y           sich       [dh]y
SFX Y   y           som        [dh]y
SFX Y   y           sim        [dh]y
SFX Y   y           sou        [dh]y
SFX Y   y           simi       [dh]y

SFX I Y 15
SFX I   i           ia         i
SFX I   i           ie         i
SFX I   i           ieho       i
SFX I   i           ej         i
SFX I   0           ch         i
SFX I   i           iemu       i
SFX I   0           m          i
SFX I   i           iu         i
SFX I   i           om         i
SFX I   i           ou         i
SFX I   0           mi         i
SFX I   i           o          i
SFX I   i           ejsi       i
SFX I   i           ejsia      i
SFX I   i           ejsie      i

SFX P Y 12
SFX P   0           jsie       e
SFX P   i           ia         i
SFX P   i           ie         i
SFX P   i           ieho       i
SFX P   i           ej         i
SFX P   0           ch         i
SFX P   i           iemu       i
SFX P   0           m          i
SFX P   i           iu         i
SFX P   i           om         i
SFX P   i           ou         i
SFX P   0           mi         i
