output.dic
afgansky/Y
akvizicny/NY
analogovy/NY
apokalypticky/NY
asketickejsi/FP
astmaticky/NY
autorov/Y
banalnejsi/FI
bankrotovy/Y
barani/I
bezbozny/NY
bezmocne/FP
bezprizorny/Y
bezuhonnejsi/FP
bici/I
biednejsi/FP
bikonvexny/NY
blokujuci/Y
blsi/I
bojovejsi/FP
bombardovaci/I
bratsky/NY
brnkaci/I
buraci/I
burzoaznodemokraticky/NY
byvoli/I
cenculovity/NY
cicavci/I
citovejsi/FP
cizelersky/Y
cvikaci/I
cakaci/I
celny/NY
cernejsi/I
cervici/I
cipkovy/Y
citaci/I
cloveci/I
crvaci/I
dakedajsi/I
danieli/I
daromny/NY
davnejsi/FI
dekansky/Y
desatprstovy/NY
diachronny/Y
dikobrazi/I
disharmonicky/Y
divadelnejsi/FP
diviaci/I
dlhodobejsi/FP
dlhosrsty/NY
dobytci/I
dodaci/I
dohodovaci/I
dojemny/NY
dopadnuty/NY
doplnaci/I
dopoludnajsi/I
dorucovaci/I
dospievajucejsi/FP
doterajsi/I
doverujuci/Y
dovtedajsi/I
drahsi/FP
dravci/I
drevoobrabaci/I
drobivy/NY
drogovejsi/FP
drozdi/I
duchaplny/NY
duzi/I
dvojdoby/NY
dvojtaktny/Y
editovaci/I
efektnejsi/FP
egejsky/NY
emigracny/Y
erotickejsi/FI
esovity/NY
exhalacny/Y
faklandsky/Y
fanatickejsi/FP
fascinovanejsi/FP
federalisticky/Y
filmovaci/I
filtrovy/Y
financnejsi/FP
fonoskopovy/Y
formatovaci/I
fregatny/Y
fritovaci/I
galantny/Y
gazeli/I
geodeticky/Y
giboni/I
goteborgcansky/Y
guliarsky/Y
hackovaci/IN
handrovy/NY
hereckejsi/FP
hlasnejsi/FI
hlavne/FP
hlinikovy/NY
hlupejsi/FP
hnusne/FP
hojnejsi/FP
holohlavy/NY
hospodarskejsi/FP
hovoriaci/INY
hrdzavejuci/NY
hrubsi/FP
hutny/NY
chapavo/FP
chorlavy/NY
chytro/FP
ideovo-umelecky/NY
idiotskejsi/FP
importovaci/I
informacnejsi/FP
inicializovany/Y
inteligentnejsi/FI
introspektivnejsi/FP
intuitivnejsi/FP
iracionalny/NY
ironickejsi/FP
istejsi/FP
jacavejsi/FP
jahnaci/I
jasne/FNP
jasnobelasy/NY
jazdiacejsi/FP
jednoduchsi/FP
jednomiestny/NY
jemnejsi/FP
juhoeuropsky/NY
juznejsi/FP
kajmani/I
karmazinovy/NY
kivi/I
klesavy/NY
kolky/NY
konciaci/INY
konecny/NY
konvertibilny/NY
kostolnicky/NY
kratsi/FP
kremacny/NY
kritickejsi/FP
krutejsi/FI
kruzivy/NY
kurilsky/NY
kuvi/I
kvalitnejsi/FP
lacnejsi/FP
lahostajne/FP
lahostajny/NY
legalizacny/NY
lenivo/FP
lenosi/I
lepsi/FNPY
letiaci/IN
liberalnodemokraticky/NY
litomysliansky/NY
lukrativnejsi/FP
luminiscencny/NY
malebnejsi/FI
maliarsky/NY
marseillsky/NY
medzijazykovy/Y
mensi/FP
metricky/NY
milsi/FP
minsky/NY
mladsi/FP
mocne/FP
mocny/NY
modelovaci/IN
moravsko-slovensky/NY
moriaci/INY
mrzkejsi/FP
mrznuci/INY
mudrejsi/FP
musi/NY
nadosobny/NY
nadvihnutejsi/FP
nahodne/FP
nahranejsi/FP
nachadzany/Y
najroznejsi/I
namahavejsi/FP
napajaci/IN
napaprceny/NY
narocnejsi/FP
nasobny/NY
neapolsky/NY
nebadane/FP
nedelnajsi/I
nehlucne/FP
nelogicky/FP
nenapadne/FP
neobrezanejsi/NP
nepohnuto/FP
neskorsi/FIP
neslychany/NY
netopieri/I
netrpezlivejsi/FP
neuspesnejsi/FP
nezmyselne/FP
nieci/I
niklovy/NY
nizsi/FP
novoutvoreny/NY
nudnejsi/FP
nutnejsi/FP
obecnejsi/FP
obilny/NY
obnovovaci/I
obrezany/NY
obtiaznejsi/FP
obycajne/FNP
obyvaci/IN
ocakavanejsi/FP
odberny/Y
oddelovaci/I
odlievaci/IN
odosobneny/Y
odovzdavaci/IN
odporne/FP
odsirovaci/IN
odsudenejsi/FP
odtrhavaci/IN
odvolaci/INY
okruzny/NY
opadanejsi/FP
opatrne/FP
opici/INY
opisovany/NY
opustivsi/I
ortogonalny/Y
ospalo/FP
ostreny/NY
osvetlujuci/IY
osviezujuco/FP
otvorene/FP
ovenceny/NY
ovladanejsi/FP
ovplyvnujuci/INY
oznamovaci/INY
pamatny/NY
paralelne/FP
pasovejsi/FP
pastiarsky/Y
peknusky/NY
pevne/FP
pieskovaci/IN
piniovy/NY
planovaci/INY
plesnivy/NY
pocitacovy/NY
podfarbenejsi/FP
podliehajuci/INY
podokenny/NY
podrobne/FP
podrobnejsi/FP
podvedome/FP
pohotovo/FP
pohruzeny/NY
poistovaci/INY
pokrocilejsi/FP
polievaci/NY
polovysoky/NY
poludnajsi/IN
pomalsi/FP
poobednajsi/NY
poprednejsi/FP
popularnejsi/FP
portativny/Y
posuvaci/NY
posypaci/I
pouzivanejsi/FP
povlakovina/NY
poznanejsi/FP
pozyvanejsi/FP
pozehnavany/NY
pravdivejsi/FP
preberajuci/NY
predavajuci/IY
predavanejsi/FP
predminulorocny/NY
predvidatelnejsi/FP
premozeny/Y
prepisovaci/I
prepracovanejsi/FP
presne/FP
presvedcivo/FP
prezentny/NY
priblizne/FP
prijemne/FNP
prijemnejsi/FP
prijimaci/INY
pripinaci/NY
priputanejsi/FP
prisnejsi/FP
prisposobivejsi/FP
prorocky/NY
prudko/FP
purpurovy/NY
ranajsi/I
razne/FP
redakcne/NY
reduplikovanejsi/FP
revualny/NY
rolovaci/I
rozbehovy/NY
rozkazovaci/I
rozmrazovaci/I
rozpadnuty/NY
rozpoctovo/FP
rozporuplnejsi/FI
rozpustaci/I
rozsirenejsi/FP
rozvijaci/I
ruci/I
rurovity/NY
rybaci/I
rydzejsi/FP
rysovaci/I
samci/I
samozvanecky/NY
scelovaci/I
sejaci/I
seminarny/NY
schopnejsi/FP
silnejsi/FP
siplavy/NY
skladaci/I
skorsi/FP
skryvaci/I
skumavy/NY
skutocne/FNP
skutocnejsi/FP
skvostnejsi/FP
slabsi/FP
sladsi/FP
sloni/I
slubny/NY
snimaci/I
snivo/FP
sojci/I
sortovo/NY
spajkovaci/I
splachovaci/I
spolahlivejsi/FP
spolocenskejsi/FP
sporadicky/NY
spravodlivejsi/FP
spriadaci/I
sprofanovanejsi/FP
srnci/I
starodavny/NY
starsi/FP
stihaci/I
stopovaci/I
strachopudsky/NY
stredajsi/I
strihaci/I
stupidne/NY
suci/I
surovinovy/NY
sviezi/I
svrabovy/NY
sepmo/NY
setrnejsi/FP
siesti/I
sirokopleci/I
sirsi/FIP
skrani/I
skriabavy/NY
skripavejsi/FP
snupaci/I
spinavsi/FP
stabny/NY
stastnejsi/FP
stiepaci/I
stihlejsi/FP
stvormo/NY
tahaci/I
taky/NY
tazsi/FP
tensi/FP
tepany/NY
teplonosny/IN
tigri/I
tlmivo/NY
traviaci/NY
tresci/I
trpny/NY
trufalejsi/FP
tuleni/I
tvrdsi/FP
ubohejsi/FP
ubytovaci/I
ucelny/NY
udatnejsi/FP
udivene/FP
ukladaci/I
ukrytejsi/FP
umorne/NY
urazene/FP
usilny/NY
usmernovaci/I
uvadzaci/I
uvelicene/NY
uzatvaraci/I
uznavanejsi/FP
uzivaci/I
vacsmi/FP
vazalsky/NY
vazenejsi/FP
vaznejsi/FP
vedecko-poznavaci/I
vedome/FNP
velkolepejsi/FP
versovaci/I
vertikalne/NY
visaci/I
vivisekcny/NY
vnutornejsi/FP
volaci/I
voli/I
voltizersky/NY
vrani/I
vseobecnovzdelavaci/I
vybudovanejsi/FP
vycestovaci/I
vycapnicky/NY
vyhladzovaci/I
vyjednavaci/I
vykopanejsi/FP
vykupne/NY
vykurovaci/I
vypinaci/I
vyraznejsi/FP
vyrovnavaci/I
vysilujuco/NY
vystiznejsi/FP
vysuvaci/INY
vytazovaci/I
vyvazeny/NY
vyznamnejsi/FP
vyzyvaci/I
vzdialene/FP
vznikajuci/INY
zabezpeceny/Y
zadavaci/I
zajtrajsi/I
zakriknuty/NY
zalesnovaci/I
zaopatrovaci/I
zaporne/NY
zasadaci/I
zasluzne/FP
zasuvaci/I
zatvaraci/I
zavitovkovy/NY
zavlazovaci/I
zdanovaci/IY
zdravsi/FP
zdvihaci/I
zhateny/NY
zjavnejsi/FP
zlomenejsi/FP
zlosovaci/I
zlostnejsi/FP
zlozitejsi/FIP
zmiji/I
zmlateny/NY
zmyselne/FP
znackovaci/I
znamejsi/FP
zosilnovaci/I
zrakovy/NY
zriadovaci/I
zuctovaci/I
zveladovaci/I
zvinovaci/I
zvlastne/NY
zabi/I
ziadanejsi/FP
ziarovkovy/Y
zihaci/I
zrebovaci/I
